Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
General Provisions

§§79-11-1 through79-11-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 153, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5310.1; Laws, 1958, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1960, ch. 180, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, chs. 229, 230; Laws, 1964, ch. 267; Laws, 1968, ch. 275, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 308, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 399; Laws, 1977, ch. 390]

§79-11-3. [Codes, 1930, § 4140; 1942, § 5319; Laws, 1928, ch. 90; Laws, 1954, ch. 199, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 200; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 150]

§79-11-5. [Codes, 1906, § 930; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4104; 1930, § 4141; 1942, § 5320; Laws, 1935, ch. 31; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 150]

§79-11-7. [Codes, 1906, § 936; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4114; 1930, § 4143; 1942, § 5322; Laws, 1928, ch. 78; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 150]

§79-11-9. [Codes, 1880, § 1029; 1892, § 834; 1906, § 899; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4071; 1930, § 4144; 1942, § 5323; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 150]

§79-11-11. [Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 2; 1871, § 2401; 1880, § 1030; 1892, § 835; 1906, § 900; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4072; 1930, § 4145; 1942, § 5324; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 150]

§79-11-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5324-01; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, § 1]

§79-11-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5324-02; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, § 2]

§79-11-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5324-03; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, § 3]

§79-11-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5324-04; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, § 4]

§79-11-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5324-05; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, § 5]

§79-11-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5324-06; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, § 6; Laws, 1986, ch. 309]

§§79-11-25 through79-11-29. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5324-07 to 5324-09; Laws, 1964, ch. 268, §§ 7-9]

For text of the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, which became effective January 1, 1988, see
§§ 79-11-101 et seq.

§79-11-31.
Religious societies.

Any religious society, consisting of the members of any particular denomination or congregation, desiring to act as an organized body may do so by associating together and electing or appointing from its membership any number of officers, trustees, or managers, by whatever name known, for the purpose of managing the affairs of the society. Such society or association shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall show the name of the society, its organization, and the election of the officers, trustees, or managers; but the society so organized at each particular locality shall be a distinct and independent society. Any society so organized may sue and be sued by its society name or appellation, and process may be served on its presiding or chief officer, or secretary, or on the trustees or manager.

Upon the completion of the organization of any such society, the title to the real property theretofore owned by it shall thereupon vest in the society as hereunder organized, and shall not be divested out of the same, or encumbered, except by a deed, deed of trust, or mortgage duly executed under the authority of a resolution adopted by a majority vote of the members present at a meeting duly called for that purpose, at which meeting at least twenty percent (20%) of the members in good standing of such organized society must be present. The minutes of such meeting shall be entered in the official record book of such society, and the aforesaid resolution shall designate which officers, trustees or managers of such society are to execute such deed, deed of trust, or mortgage.

The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to all real property acquired by any such society after its organization hereunder.

Whenever any number of religious societies or organized bodies or congregations formed under subsection (1) of this section shall decide to act together as an organized body, they may do so in the manner provided in subsection (1) by and through representatives elected or appointed for that purpose, and when so organized shall likewise be a distinct and independent society or group, by whatever name called, and subject to sue and be sued and be served with process in the same manner.

Any such body shall likewise have the right to own all, but only, those properties permitted under Section 79-11-33 of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 52; 1871, § 2437; 1880, § 1071; 1892, § 859; 1906, § 933; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4109; 1930, § 4168; 1942, § 5350; Laws, 1952, ch. 343; Laws, 1956, ch. 177, §§ 1, 2.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsection (2) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “...by and through representatives elected...” for “by and through representative elected...” in the first paragraph, and inserting the word “the” following “...body shall likewise have.” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Lease of church land by a board of education, see § 29-3-69.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-401.

For the service of process, see Miss. Rule of Civil Proc. 4.

This section [Code 1942, § 5350] and Code of 1942, § 5351, were inapplicable to a dispute as to use and occupancy of church property between the majority members of a church, who desired to withdraw from the church conference and enter a new church organization, and the minority, who desired to continue the existing church under the faith and rules of discipline by which the church was formerly governed. Linton v. Flowers, 230 Miss. 838, 94 So. 2d 615, 1957 Miss. LEXIS 430 (Miss. 1957).

Proof showing that a church had been an active organization since about 1920, since 1950 had maintained records showing the names of the trustees, had employed a preacher since the latter date, had conducted regular church services, and that its parsonage had been occupied, was ample to show the existence of the church and that it was an organized religious congregation or society under this section [Code 1942, § 5350]. Casey v. Valentour, 218 So. 2d 863, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1625 (Miss. 1969).

Church was operating as an unincorporated religious society under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-31 where it manifested a desire to act as an organized body and membership associating together, it had elected or appointed officers, trustees, or managers to manage its affairs, and it kept records of its proceedings even though most of the records had been lost in a recent fire. Coleman v. State, 947 So. 2d 878, 2006 Miss. LEXIS 681 (Miss. 2006).

Religious organization is not corporate body under statute without some affirmative action to avail itself of provisions of statute. Gullett v. First Christian Church, 154 Miss. 516, 122 So. 732, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1929).

It is common knowledge that religious congregation maintain organizations and engage in church activities, and appoint or elect from membership officers to transact business. Gullett v. First Christian Church, 154 Miss. 516, 122 So. 732, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1929).

For religious organization to become organized body under statute, it must elect from its membership officers, etc., and must keep record of its proceedings, showing among other things its organization. Gullett v. First Christian Church, 154 Miss. 516, 122 So. 732, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1929).

Evidence held insufficient to show religious organization, sued for personal injuries, was legal entity organized under statute. Gullett v. First Christian Church, 154 Miss. 516, 122 So. 732, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1929).

Officer of religious congregation on whom process was served as agent could plead nul tiel corporation in his own name. Gullett v. First Christian Church, 154 Miss. 516, 122 So. 732, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1929).

Unincorporated church society cannot be dealt with nor act as corporation. Paine's Chapel of African Methodist Episcopal Church v. Aberdeen Realty Co., 120 Miss. 12, 81 So. 650, 1919 Miss. LEXIS 61 (Miss. 1919).

Where a deed named the grantee as “Church and Trustees” without naming any church organization or trustee, the deed was void for want of a grantee and the attempted qualification therein that the property should be “free for all denominations so as to not conflict with our meeting days” was likewise void and appellants, having acquired title by adverse possession for more than six times the statutory period, were not bound thereby. Ivey v. Geisler, 213 Miss. 212, 56 So. 2d 501, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 352 (Miss. 1952).

Because a resolution only authorized an exchange of deeds to correct an inaccurate property description, the inclusion of a reverter clause in land deeded to a church was not valid because there was no compliance with Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-31(1). Sones v. Sones Chapel Baptist Church, 946 So. 2d 833, 2007 Miss. App. LEXIS 11 (Miss. Ct. App. 2007).

The strict rule applicable to ordinary property in respect of the character of adverse possession required is not applied in the case of property used for church purposes and there is sufficient possession of such property if it is used in the way that such property is ordinarily used. Ivey v. Geisler, 213 Miss. 212, 56 So. 2d 501, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 352 (Miss. 1952).

Unincorporated religious societies may acquire title by adverse possession even as against a grantor where property is openly diverted from a use specified in the grant. Ivey v. Geisler, 213 Miss. 212, 56 So. 2d 501, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 352 (Miss. 1952).

Religious society, having unlawfully acquired title to land, may continue in enjoyment thereof until right thereto is successfully questioned in direct proceeding by State. Peeples v. Enochs, 170 Miss. 472, 153 So. 796, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 93 (Miss. 1934), but see Stern v. Gatzaros, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3755 (N.D. Miss. Mar. 3, 1999).

Deed to C. Schoolhouse and C. Graveyard, neither of which appeared on face to be religious society, held void for want of grantee, where such society never existed. Morgan v. Collins School, 157 Miss. 295, 127 So. 565, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 257 (Miss. 1930).

Necessity of delivery of stock certificate to complete valid gift of stock. 23 A.L.R.2d 1171.

Validity of restrictions on alienation or transfer of corporate stock. 61 A.L.R.2d 1318.

Determination of property rights between local church and parent church body: modern view. 52 A.L.R.3d 324.

Liability of religious association for damages for intentionally tortious conduct in recruitment, indoctrination, or related activity. 40 A.L.R.4th 1062.

Liability for personal injury or death allegedly caused by defect in church premises. 8 A.L.R.5th 1.

66 Am. Jur. 2d, Religious Societies §§ 3 et seq.

16 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Religious Societies §§ 224:1 et seq.

21 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Religious Societies, Forms 1 et seq. (organization).

§79-11-33.
Religious societies may own certain property.

Any religious society, ecclesiastical body and/or any congregation thereof may hold and own the following real property, but no other, viz.:

Each house or building used as a place of worship, with a reasonable quantity of ground annexed to such building or house.

Each house or building, together with a reasonable quantity of ground thereto annexed, used:

As a parish house;

As a community facility;

As a Sunday school facility;

As an educational facility;

For the care of children on a nonprofit basis.

Each house used for a place of residence for its minister, bishop or representative, together with a reasonable quantity of ground thereto annexed. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “minister” shall mean a minister, priest, pastor, rabbi, nun or other clergy who: (i) has been duly ordained, licensed or qualified according to the principles and procedures prescribed by his religious society, (ii) is regularly engaged as a vocation in preaching and teaching the beliefs of his religious society, in administering its rites and sacraments, and in conducting public worship services in the tradition of his religious society, and (iii) who discharges the duties of a minister in the tradition of his religious society.

A hospital or infirmary and a nurses’ home in connection therewith, together with a reasonable quantity of ground thereto annexed.

All buildings used by a school, college or seminary of learning contiguous to and/or a part of the college or seminary plant, for administration, classrooms, laboratories, observatories, dormitories, and for housing the faculty and students thereof, together with a reasonable quantity of land in connection therewith.

All buildings used for an orphan asylum or institution, together with a reasonable quantity of ground used in connection therewith.

All buildings used for a campground or assembly for religious purposes, together with a reasonable quantity of land in connection therewith.

Lands for a cemetery or cemeteries of sufficient dimensions.

All buildings and grounds used for denominational headquarters and/or administrative purposes, together with a reasonable quantity of ground annexed thereto. The title to any buildings and grounds heretofore acquired under this subsection shall not be hereafter held invalid because of the lack of authority of the owner thereof to obtain or hold such title. Provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not affect any pending litigation.

Any land which is maintained and used as a parking area for the convenience of the members of the congregation, church, cathedral, mission or other unit or administrative unit from which the society receives no revenue, fee, charge or assessment. The land on which the parking area is located may be noncontiguous to the land on which the building used as the place of worship is located.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 934; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4110; 1930, § 4169; 1942, § 5351; Laws, 1926, ch. 194; Laws, 1946, ch. 279, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 440, eff from and after January 1, 1978.

Lease of church land by a board of education, see § 29-3-69.

Trust funds for maintenance of cemeteries, see § 41-43-3.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-401.

Applicability of burial associations law, see § 83-37-33.

A dispute as to who were the proper trustees of the property of a congregational church and the identity of the pastor and deacons were ecclesiastical questions rather than issues of property rights, and did not present proper questions for the court’s decisions, even though an issue concerning property was indirectly involved, such property issue being so collateral and insubstantial as not to warrant judicial interference with the freedom of the church. Blue v. Jones, 230 So. 2d 569, 1970 Miss. LEXIS 1555 (Miss. 1970).

Code 1942, § 5350, and this section [Code 1942, § 5351] were inapplicable to a dispute as to use and occupancy of church property between the majority members of the church, who desired to withdraw from the church conference and enter a new church organization, and the minority, who desired to continue the existing church under the faith and rules of discipline by which the church was formerly governed. Linton v. Flowers, 230 Miss. 838, 94 So. 2d 615, 1957 Miss. LEXIS 430 (Miss. 1957).

Church which is incorporated under laws of this state is necessary party to suit when its physical assets held in its corporate capacity are involved. Conic v. Cobbins, 208 Miss. 203, 44 So. 2d 52, 1950 Miss. LEXIS 240 (Miss. 1950).

Unless some property rights are involved, civil courts have no jurisdiction over ecclesiastical controversies and are without jurisdiction to decide who is, or who ought to be, presiding bishop of the diocese. Conic v. Cobbins, 208 Miss. 203, 44 So. 2d 52, 1950 Miss. LEXIS 240 (Miss. 1950).

Religious society, having unlawfully acquired title to land, may continue in enjoyment thereof until right thereto is successfully questioned in direct proceeding by state. Peeples v. Enochs, 170 Miss. 472, 153 So. 796, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 93 (Miss. 1934), but see Stern v. Gatzaros, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3755 (N.D. Miss. Mar. 3, 1999).

Deed to C. Schoolhouse and C. Graveyard, neither of which appeared on face to be religious society, held void for want of grantee, where such society never existed. Morgan v. Collins School, 157 Miss. 295, 127 So. 565, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 257 (Miss. 1930).

Religious society’s property holding in excess of statutory limit is not forfeited, statute not expressly requiring it. State ex rel. Knox v. Sisters of Mercy, 150 Miss. 559, 115 So. 323, 1928 Miss. LEXIS 100 (Miss. 1928).

Only the state can take advantage of restrictions imposed by statute on amount of property that religious society can hold. State ex rel. Knox v. Sisters of Mercy, 150 Miss. 559, 115 So. 323, 1928 Miss. LEXIS 100 (Miss. 1928).

State can merely force a sale of property held by religious society in excess of statutory limit. State ex rel. Knox v. Sisters of Mercy, 150 Miss. 559, 115 So. 323, 1928 Miss. LEXIS 100 (Miss. 1928).

An unincorporated religious society is an entity, and it may acquire title to real estate by adverse possession; and there is sufficient possession of such property if it is used in the way such property is ordinarily used. Casey v. Valentour, 218 So. 2d 863, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1625 (Miss. 1969).

Unincorporated religious societies may acquire title by adverse possession even as against a grantor where property is openly diverted from a use specified in the grant. Ivey v. Geisler, 213 Miss. 212, 56 So. 2d 501, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 352 (Miss. 1952).

The strict rule applicable to ordinary property in respect of the character of adverse possession required is not applied in the case of property used for church purposes and there is sufficient possession of such property if it is used in the way that such property is ordinarily used. Ivey v. Geisler, 213 Miss. 212, 56 So. 2d 501, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 352 (Miss. 1952).

Where a deed named the grantee as “Church and Trustees” without naming any church organization or trustee, the deed was void for want of a grantee and the attempted qualification therein that the property should be “free for all denominations so as to not conflict with our meeting days” was likewise void, and appellants, having acquired title by adverse possession for more than six times the statutory period, were not bound thereby. Ivey v. Geisler, 213 Miss. 212, 56 So. 2d 501, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 352 (Miss. 1952).

While the fact that a religious or charitable society chooses to act in the corporate form may not disqualify it for an exemption from ad valorem taxation under § 27-31-1(d), the general exemption provided in the first clause of § 27-31-1(d) is limited to property used for the activities of the society itself, and the amount of property is limited by the usages enumerated in §
Hattiesburg Area Senior Servs. v. Lamar County, 633 So. 2d 440, 1994 Miss. LEXIS 38 (Miss. 1994).

Land owned by college, located about one-fourth of a mile from the campus and used for truck gardening and for growing corn and hay for the horses owned and used by the college, and not in excess of the maximum limitation on exempt holdings, was exempt from taxation. City of Jackson v. Belhaven College, 195 Miss. 734, 15 So. 2d 621, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 161 (Miss. 1943).

Attempted back assessment of taxes against tract of land owned by college, not in excess of maximum limitation, located about one-fourth of a mile from the campus and used for trucking purposes, as well as for growing corn and hay for the horses owned and used by the college, was void, since such tract was exempt from taxation. City of Jackson v. Belhaven College, 195 Miss. 734, 15 So. 2d 621, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 161 (Miss. 1943).

Religious society’s land used in connection with college held not taxable merely because platted and subdivided into lots for future sale. Chandler v. Executive Committee on Education, 165 Miss. 690, 146 So. 597, 1933 Miss. LEXIS 286 (Miss. 1933).

Injunction held not proper method to determine exemption of church property. North American Old Roman Catholic Diocese v. Havens, 164 Miss. 119, 144 So. 473, 1932 Miss. LEXIS 244 (Miss. 1932).

Property owned by church not exempt from taxation when it has no right to own it. Gunter v. Jackson, 130 Miss. 686, 94 So. 842, 1922 Miss. LEXIS 240 (Miss. 1922).

Adverse possession by religious society. 4 A.L.R.2d 123.

Validity, as charitable trust, of gift to church, church society, or trustees or officers thereof, without declaration or restriction as to its use or purpose. 81 A.L.R.2d 819.

Determination of property rights between local church and parent church body: modern view. 52 A.L.R.3d 324.

66 Am. Jur. 2d, Religious Societies §§ 30 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Cemeteries § 54:71.1 (rules – lot owners-restriction of burial to persons of certain religious faith).

16 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Religious Societies §§ 224:71 et seq.

21 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Religious Societies, Forms 31 et seq. (property and financial management).

76 C.J.S., Religious Societies §§ 72, 73 et seq.

§§79-11-35 and79-11-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 485, § 153, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-35. [En, Laws, 1976, ch. 333, § 1]

§79-11-37. [En, Laws, 1976, ch. 333, § 2]

For text of the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act which became effective January 1, 1988, see
§§ 79-11-101 et seq.

§79-11-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 333, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

[En, Laws, 1976, ch. 333, § 3]

For text of the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act which became effective January 1, 1988, see
§§ 79-11-101 et seq.

§79-11-41.
Trust funds for church maintenance; election to be subject to provisions of §§79-11-41 through79-11-47; religious society defined.

Any religious society or any organization organized for the purpose of owning, maintaining or operating a church may elect to be subject to the provisions of Sections 79-11-41 through 79-11-47. For the purposes of Sections 79-11-41 through 79-11-47, religious society includes without limitation any church, temple, synagogue, religious congregation, ecclesiastical body or religious denomination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 483, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§79-11-43.
Designation as “perpetual religious society trust funds religious societies.”

All such organizations subject to the provisions of Sections 79-11-41 through 79-11-47 shall be, for the purposes hereof, designated as “perpetual religious society trust fund religious societies.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 483, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§79-11-45.
Operation and establishment of a perpetual religious society trust fund.

Every religious society, subject to the provisions of Sections 79-11-41 through 79-11-47, which is organized, commences or continues to operate in the State of Mississippi after July 1, 1994, and desires to avail itself of the benefits of Sections 79-11-41 through 79-11-47, may provide for the creation and establishment of an irrevocable perpetual religious society trust fund, the principal of which shall permanently remain intact except as hereinafter provided and only the income thereof shall be devoted to the perpetual care of the grounds and buildings of such religious society or which may be used to further the religious purposes of such religious society, and which principal shall be known as the perpetual care fund of such religious society. This fund shall be created and established from funds collected by or donated to the religious society.

The perpetual religious society trust fund shall be permanently set aside in trust to be administered under the jurisdiction of the chancery court of the chancery court district wherein the religious society is located. The chancery courts so having jurisdiction shall have full jurisdiction over the reports and accounting of trustees, amount of surety bond required, if any, and investment of funds. The courts may waive the surety bond and control of investments in the case of trusts placed with an established bank or corporate trustee. Only the income from such fund shall be used for the care and maintenance or to further the religious purposes of the religious society for which it was established.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 483, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities §§ 6, 9, 38-40.

77 C.J.S., Religious Societies §§ 82, 83, 89-95.

§79-11-47.
Accounting and reporting requirements for auditing procedures for certain records.

The provisions of this section shall apply to every religious society that elects to establish and maintain a perpetual religious society trust fund as provided in Section 79-11-45.

Within thirty (30) days after the end of the calendar or its fiscal year, each religious society covered hereunder shall file with the clerk of the chancery court having jurisdiction thereof an annual account, which account shall contain the following information:

The name of the religious society, the date of organization and the location of the religious society;

The amounts paid into the perpetual religious society trust fund, and the income earned therefrom during the preceding fiscal year;

The names and addresses of the officers of the religious society and any change of control which has occurred during the past fiscal or calendar year.

The custodian or trustee of the perpetual religious society trust fund of each religious society shall annually prepare and file with the religious society a detailed accounting and report of such fund on or before March 31 of each year for the calendar year ending the preceding December 31 or within ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year of the trust agreement, which report shall include, among other things, properly itemized, the securities in which the monies in the fund are then invested. The accounting and report shall be at all times available to inspection and copy by any member of the religious society at the usual place for transacting the regular affairs of the religious society. Within forty-five (45) days after the time by which the custodian or trustee’s accounting and report is required to be filed with the religious society officers, the religious society officers shall file a copy of such accounting and report with the clerk of the chancery court.

As a condition to the transfer of any perpetual religious society trust fund monies from one trustee or trust institution to another, the religious society for which such fund is maintained shall, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the time when such transfer is to occur, file with the chancery clerk a written notice of intent to transfer accompanied with a letter of intent to receive such trust fund monies from the trustee or trust institution to which such trust fund monies are to be transferred. Such fund monies shall be transferred directly from the existing custodian or trustee to the receiving custodian or trustee.

Each chancery clerk shall maintain a properly indexed book of record in which there shall be kept, preserved and open for public inspection a copy of each record, report and notice required to be filed with the chancery clerk under the provisions of this section. For filing and indexing the records, reports and notices under this section, the chancery clerk shall be authorized to charge such fees as are provided in Section 25-7-9 for the recording and indexing of deeds.

The clerk of the chancery court having jurisdiction shall, upon the failure to timely receive any of the records, reports or notices provided for in this section, immediately give notice by registered letter to the religious society, its officers and directors, at their last known address, that such records, reports or notices have not been received.

Whenever it reasonably appears to the court upon complaint filed with the chancery court having jurisdiction thereof by any religious society member, or the family, legal representative or next of kin of any such member participating in the perpetual care religious society, that (a) such perpetual religious society trust fund is insolvent or about to become insolvent; or (b) no perpetual religious society trust fund has been established for such religious society or, if established, the trust fund does not contain such funds as are required to be contained therein, the court shall order a private audit and examination of any perpetual religious society trust fund of such religious society.

In the event that such audit and examination shows that the perpetual care religious society trust fund is insolvent or is about to become insolvent, or that a sufficient trust fund is not established or being maintained for such perpetual care religious society trust fund, the court shall exercise such jurisdiction and make and issue such orders and decrees as may be necessary to correct and enforce compliance with the provisions of Sections 79-11-41 through 79-11-47 and all such other orders and decrees as shall be just, equitable and in the public interest, including the appointment of receivers to continue or terminate the operation of such perpetual care trust fund of such religious society.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 483, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.